Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB149.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4702(g) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4702. Requirement for periodic inspection of vehicles.* * *(g) Exceptions.--The following are exceptions to subsection (f):* * *(5) Emission inspection criteria for newest model year vehicles.--A subject vehicle shall be exempt from the requirements for emission inspection for five years after the vehicle is manufactured. A one-time certificate of exemption shall be affixed to the subject vehicle for the entire 123456789101112131415161718 duration of the exemption and in a manner prescribed by department regulation. After the fifth year, the subject vehicle shall receive an emission inspection in accordance with this section. The following shall apply:(i) The department shall notify each official inspection station on a periodic basis of vehicles exempt from the requirements for emission inspection.(ii) This paragraph shall not apply to the extent that Federal funding would not be received by the Commonwealth due to the exemption under this paragraph. Notice of nonapplicability under this subparagraph shall be transmitted by the department to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(6) Gas cap test not required for certain vehicles.--A subject vehicle that was manufactured without a gas cap shall not be required to receive a gas cap test to determine whether or not the subject vehicle's gas cap is functioning as designed.(h) Anti-tampering inspection.--Notwithstanding subsection (g)(5), the five most recent model year vehicles shall be subject to visual anti-tampering inspections for the presence of emissions control components installed on the vehicle by manufacturers, which may occur during the annual safety inspection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0149PN0101 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526